North Carolina, session 2025, SB167.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) For the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, the State Board of Education
shall develop guidelines for identifying and providing services to students with limited
proficiency in the English language, as follows:
(1) The State Board of Education shall allocate these funds to local school
administrative units and to charter schools under a formula that takes into
account the average percentage of students in the units or the charters over the
past three years who have limited English proficiency. The State Board of
Education shall allocate funds to a unit or a charter school only if (i) average
daily membership of the unit or the charter school includes at least 20 students
with limited English proficiency or (ii) students with limited English
proficiency comprise at least two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the average
daily membership of the unit or charter school. For the portion of the funds
that is allocated on the basis of the number of identified students, the State
Board of Education shall not set a maximum number or percentage of
identified students for whom a unit or charter school may receive funds.
(2) Local school administrative units shall use funds allocated to them to pay for
classroom teachers, teacher assistants, tutors, textbooks, classroom
materials/instructional supplies/equipment, transportation costs, and staff
development of teachers for students with limited English proficiency.
(3) A county in which a local school administrative unit receives funds under this
section shall use the funds to supplement local current expense funds and shall
not supplant local current expense funds.
SECTION 1.(b) The Department of Public Instruction shall prepare a current head
count of the number of students classified with limited English proficiency by December 1 of
each year. Students in the head count shall be assessed at least once every three years to determine
their level of English proficiency.
SECTION 2. The State Board of Education shall study the allotment for students
with limited English proficiency (LEP), as enacted by Section 1 of this act. No later than
December 31, 2025, the State Board of Education shall report the results of its study to the Joint
*S167-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division. The report shall
include, at a minimum, the following information:
(1) Whether the current LEP allotment is aligned with resources needed to ensure
that students with limited English proficiency have the opportunity to become
proficient in English.
(2) A recommended funding factor to be included in the LEP allotment to account
for the number of languages spoken by students in local school administrative
units and charter schools.
(3) A recommended plan to foster more bilingual education programs in the State.
(4) Recommended funding models, with associated costs, to eliminate any
achievement gap between students who are proficient in English and students
with limited English proficiency.
(5) An analysis of the effects of eliminating in the LEP allotment any
consideration of (i) the concentration of students with limited English
proficiency and (ii) a minimum eligibility threshold. The analysis should
include whether to eliminate any or all of these components of the LEP
allotment and proposed alternative metrics for allotting these funds.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of sixteen million two hundred thousand dollars ($16,200,000) in
recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to increase the students with limited English
proficiency allotment.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 Senate Bill 167-First Edition